Utah statutes.
30-3-5.2 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Allegations of child abuse or child sexual abuse -- Investigation.

When, in any divorce proceeding or upon a request for modification of a divorce decree, an allegation of child abuse or child sexual abuse is made, implicating either party, the court, after making an inquiry, may order that an investigation be conducted by the Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 4a.  A final award of custody or parent-time may not be rendered until a report on that investigation, consistent with Section 62A-4a-412, is received by the court.  That investigation shall be conducted by the Division of Child and Family Services within 30 days of the court's notice and request for an investigation. In reviewing this report, the court shall comply with Section 78A-2-227.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

